Utah statutes.
70A-9a-622.   Effect of acceptance of collateral.
(1)  A secured party's acceptance of collateral in full or partial
satisfaction of the obligation it secures:
(a)  discharges the obligation to the extent consented to by the debtor;
(b)  transfers to the secured party all of a debtor's rights in the
collateral;
(c)  discharges the security interest or agricultural lien that is the subject
of the debtor's consent and any subordinate security interest or other
subordinate lien; and
(d)  terminates any other subordinate interest.
(2)  A subordinate interest is discharged or terminated under Subsection (1),
even if the secured party fails to comply with this title.
